Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4
POWERSPORTS VEHICLES

44-20-401. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that:

The sale and distribution of powersports vehicles affects the public interest, and a significant factor of inducement in making a sale of a powersports vehicle is the trust and confidence of the purchaser in the dealer from whom the purchase is made and the expectancy that the dealer will remain in business to provide service for the vehicle;

The proper sale and service of a powersports vehicle are important to consumer safety, and the manufacturers and distributors of powersports vehicles have an obligation to the public not to terminate or refuse to continue their franchise agreements with retail powersports vehicle dealers unless the powersports vehicle manufacturer or distributor has first established good cause for termination of any such agreement, to the end that there shall be no diminution of locally available service;

The licensing and supervision of powersports vehicle dealers by the motor vehicle dealer board are necessary for the protection of consumers, and therefore, the sale of powersports vehicles by unlicensed dealers or salespersons, or by licensed dealers or salespersons who have demonstrated unfitness, should be prevented; and

Consumer education concerning the rules of the powersports vehicle industry, the considerations when purchasing a powersports vehicle, and the role, functions, and actions of the motor vehicle dealer board are necessary for the protection of the public and for maintaining the trust and confidence of the public in the motor vehicle dealer board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 94, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-501 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-402. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"ANSI/SVIA-1-2001" means the American national standards institute's, or its successor organization's, provisions for four-wheel all-terrain vehicles, equipment configuration, and performance requirements, developed by the specialty vehicle institute of America, or its successor organization.

"Board" means the motor vehicle dealer board.

"Consumer" means a purchaser, renter, or lessee of a powersports vehicle that is primarily used for business, personal, family, or household purposes. "Consumer" does not include a purchaser of powersports vehicles primarily for resale.

"Custom trailer" means a vehicle that is not driven or propelled by its own power and is designed to be attached to, become a part of, or be drawn by a motor vehicle and that is uniquely designed and manufactured for a specific purpose or customer. "Custom trailer" does not include manufactured housing, farm tractors, and other machines and tools used in the production, harvest, and care of farm products.

"Director" means the director of the auto industry division created in section 44-20-105.

"Franchise" means the authority to sell or service and repair powersports vehicles of a designated line-make granted through a sales, service, and parts agreement with a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

"Line-make" means a group or series of powersports vehicles that have the same brand identification or brand name, based upon the powersports vehicle manufacturer's trademark, trade name, or logo.

"New powersports vehicle" mean a powersports vehicle that has been transferred on a manufacturer's statement of origin and for which an ownership registration card has been submitted by the original owner to the powersports vehicle manufacturer.

"Off-highway vehicle" means any self-propelled vehicle that is designed to travel on wheels or tracks in contact with the ground, designed primarily for use off of the public highways, and generally and commonly used to transport persons for recreational purposes. "Off-highway vehicle" does not include the following:

Military vehicles;

Golf carts;

Vehicles designed and used to carry persons with disabilities; and

Vehicles designed and used specifically for agricultural, logging, or mining purposes.

"Personal watercraft" means a motorboat that is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on the vessel, rather than the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel, and that is designed primarily for use off of the public highways, and that uses either of the following as the primary source of motive power:

An inboard motor powering a water jet pump; or

An outboard motor-driven propeller.

"Powersports vehicle" means any of the following:

An off-highway vehicle;

A personal watercraft; or

A snowmobile.

"Powersports vehicle dealer" means a person who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, leases, exchanges, rents with option to purchase, offers, or attempts to negotiate a sale, lease, or exchange of an interest in new or new and used powersports vehicles or who is engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling or leasing new or new and used powersports vehicles, whether or not the powersports vehicles are owned by the person. The sale or lease of ten or more new or new and used powersports vehicles or the offering for sale or lease of more than ten new or new and used powersports vehicles at the same address or telephone number in any one calendar year shall be prima facie evidence that a person is engaged in the business of selling or leasing new or new and used powersports vehicles. "Powersports vehicle dealer" includes an owner of real property who allows more than ten new or new and used powersports vehicles to be offered for sale or lease on the property during one calendar year unless the property is leased to a licensed powersports vehicle dealer. "Powersports vehicle dealer" does not include:

Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or acting under the judgment or order of any court;

Public officers while performing their official duties;

Employees of persons enumerated in the definition of "powersports vehicle dealer" when engaged in the specific performance of their duties as employees;

A wholesaler or anyone selling powersports vehicles solely to wholesalers; or

A wholesale motor vehicle auctioneer.

"Powersports vehicle distributor" means a person, resident or nonresident, who, in whole or in part, sells or distributes new powersports vehicles to powersports vehicle dealers or who maintains powersports vehicle distributor representatives.

"Powersports vehicle manufacturer" means any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new powersports vehicles.

"Powersports vehicle manufacturer representative" means a representative employed by a person who manufactures or assembles powersports vehicles for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of the person's powersports vehicles or for supervising or contacting its dealers or prospective dealers.

"Powersports vehicle salesperson" means a natural person who, for a salary, commission, or compensation of any kind, is employed either directly or indirectly, regularly or occasionally, by a powersports vehicle dealer to sell, lease, purchase, or exchange or to negotiate for the sale, lease, purchase, or exchange of powersports vehicles.

"Principal place of business" means a site or location for which the powersports vehicle dealer is licensed, sufficiently designated to admit of definite description, with space thereon or contiguous thereto adequate to permit the display of one or more new or used powersports vehicles, and including a permanent enclosed building or structure to accommodate the office of the dealer and to provide a safe place to keep the books and other records of the business of the dealer, at which site or location the principal portion of the dealer's business shall be conducted and the books and records thereof kept and maintained; except that a dealer may keep its books and records at an off-site location in Colorado after notifying the board in writing of the location at least thirty days in advance. Motor vehicle and used motor vehicle dealers shall be authorized to offer both motor vehicles and powersports vehicles from the same principal place of business. In the case of motor vehicle dealers, the principal place of business shall be at the address set forth in the dealer's sales agreement.

"Snowmobile" means a self-propelled vehicle primarily designed or altered for travel on snow or ice when supported in part by skis, belts, or cleats and designed primarily for use off of the public highways. "Snowmobile" shall not include machinery used strictly for the grooming of snowmobile trails or ski slopes.

"Used powersports vehicle" means a powersports vehicle that is not a new powersports vehicle.

"Used powersports vehicle dealer" means any person who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, leases, or offers an interest in used powersports vehicles, or attempts to negotiate a sale or lease of new and used powersports vehicles or who is engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling used powersports vehicles, whether or not the used powersports vehicles are owned by the person. The sale of ten or more used powersports vehicles or the offering for sale of more than ten used powersports vehicles at the same address or telephone number in any one calendar year shall be prima facie evidence that a person is engaged in the business of selling used powersports vehicles. "Used powersports vehicle dealer" includes an owner of real property who allows more than ten used powersports vehicles to be offered for sale on the property during one calendar year unless the property is leased to a licensed used powersports vehicle dealer. "Used powersports vehicle dealer" does not include:

Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or acting under the judgment or order of any court;

Public officers while performing their official duties;

Employees of used powersports vehicle dealers when engaged in the specific performance of their duties;

Anyone selling powersports vehicles solely to wholesalers;

Mortgagees or secured parties as to powersports vehicles constituting collateral on a mortgage or security agreement, if the mortgagees or secured parties shall not realize for their own account from the sales any money in excess of the outstanding balance secured by the mortgage or security agreement, plus costs of collection; or

A motor vehicle auctioneer.

"Wholesaler" means a person who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, or offers or attempts to negotiate a sale, lease, or exchange of an interest in a new or new and used powersports vehicle solely to powersports vehicle dealers or used powersports vehicle dealers.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 95, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-502 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 4, see § 44-20-102.

44-20-403. Motor vehicle dealer board.

Powersports vehicle dealers, used powersports vehicle dealers, powersports vehicle manufacturers, distributors, and manufacturer representatives, and powersports vehicle salespersons shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 98, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-503 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-404. Board - powers and duties - rules.

In addition to the duties and powers of the board under section 44-20-104, the board may:

Promulgate, amend, and repeal rules reasonably necessary to implement this part 4, including, without limitation, the administration, enforcement, issuance, and denial of licenses to wholesalers, powersports vehicle dealers, powersports vehicle salespersons, and used powersports vehicle dealers;

Delegate to the board's executive secretary, employed pursuant to section 44-20-405 (1)(b), the authority to execute all actions within the power of the board, carry out the directives of the board, and make recommendations to the board on all matters within the authority of the board;

Issue through the department a temporary license to an applicant seeking a license issued by the board, which temporary license shall permit the applicant to operate for not more than one hundred twenty days, during which time the board may complete its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the qualifications of the applicant for the license;

Issue through the department and, for reasonable cause shown or upon satisfactory proof of the unfitness of the applicant under this part 4, refuse to issue to any applicant any license the board is authorized to issue by this part 4;

Permit the director to issue licenses pursuant to rules adopted by the board under subsection (1)(a) of this section;

After due notice and a hearing:

Review the findings of an administrative law judge or hearing officer from a hearing conducted pursuant to this part 4; or

Revoke and suspend or order the director to issue or to reinstate, on such terms and conditions and for such period of time as the board deems fair and just, any license issued pursuant to this part 4;

Issue a letter of admonition for a minor violation of this part 4 that does not become a part of the licensee's record with the board;

Issue a letter of reprimand and a notice of the right to request formal disciplinary proceedings, in writing within twenty days, to a licensee for a violation of this part 4, which letter is a part of the licensee's record with the board for a period of two years after issuance and may be considered in aggravation of any subsequent violation by the licensee; except that the letter shall be vacated and a formal disciplinary proceeding shall be instituted upon a written request within twenty days after the letter is issued;

Investigate, with the assistance of the director, on its own motion or upon a written and signed complaint from any person, a suspected or alleged violation by a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, or powersports vehicle salesperson of this part 4 or a rule promulgated by the board;

Issue subpoenas or delegate the authority to issue subpoenas to the director;

Require the director to investigate complaints transmitted by the board pursuant to section 44-20-405 (3)(b) and (3)(c);

Seek to resolve disputes before beginning an investigation or hearing through its own action or by direction of the director;

If the board determines that there is probable cause to believe a violation of this article 20 has occurred after an investigation by the director, order an administrative hearing be held pursuant to section 24-4-105.

Summarily issue to any person who is licensed by the board pursuant to this part 4 cease-and-desist orders on such terms and conditions and for such time as the board deems fair and just, if the orders are followed by notice and a hearing pursuant to this section;

Prescribe the forms to be used for applications for persons licensed under this part 4;

Require of an applicant, as a requisite to the issuance of a license, information concerning the applicant's fitness to be licensed under this part 4 as the board considers necessary;

Adopt a seal with the words "motor vehicle dealer board" and such other devices as the board may desire engraved thereon by which it shall authenticate the acts of its office;

Require that a powersports vehicle dealer's or used powersports vehicle dealer's principal place of business and such other sites or locations operated by the dealer have signs or devices giving notice of the dealer's name, the location and address of the dealer's principal place of business, and the type and number of licenses held by the dealer, as the board considers necessary to notify any person doing business with the dealer to identify the dealer, and for this purpose to promulgate rules determining the size, shape, lettering, and location of the signs or devices;

Cause to be conducted written examinations, as prescribed by the board, to test the competency of all first-time applicants for a wholesaler's license, powersports vehicle dealer's license, used powersports vehicle dealer's license, or powersports vehicle salesperson's license;

Promulgate rules requiring off-highway vehicles sold by persons licensed under this part 4 to comply with ANSI/SVIA-1-2001 or a successor standard promulgated by the American national standards institute or its successor organization if the rules do not conflict with the ANSI standards or set standards more stringent than those set by ANSI;

Prescribe forms to be used as a part of a contract for the sale of a powersports vehicle by a powersports vehicle dealer or powersports vehicle salesperson, other than a retail installment sales contract subject to the provisions of the "Uniform Consumer Credit Code", articles 1 to 9 of title 5, that shall include the following information in addition to any other disclosures or information required by state or federal law:

In twelve-point, bold-faced type, or at least three points larger than the smallest type appearing in the contract, an instruction that the form is a legal instrument and that, if the purchaser of the powersports vehicle does not understand the form, the purchaser should seek legal assistance;

In the type and size specified in subsection (1)(m)(I)(A) of this section, an instruction that only those terms in written form embody the contract for sale of a powersports vehicle and that any conflicting oral representations made to the purchaser are void;

In the type and size specified in subsection (1)(m)(I)(A) of this section, a notice that fraud or misrepresentation in the sale of a powersports vehicle is punishable under the laws of this state;

In the type and size specified in subsection (1)(m)(I)(A) of this section, if the contract for the sale of a powersports vehicle requires a single, lump sum payment of the purchase price, a clear disclosure to the purchaser of this fact or, if the contract is contingent upon the approval of credit financing for the purchaser arranged by or through the powersports vehicle dealer, a statement that the purchaser shall agree to purchase the powersports vehicle that is the subject of the sale from the powersports vehicle dealer at not greater than a certain annual percentage rate of financing that shall be agreed upon by the parties and entered in writing on the contract;

Except as otherwise provided under this part 4, if the purchase price of the powersports vehicle is not paid to the powersports vehicle dealer in full at the time of consummation of the sale and the vehicle dealer delivers and the purchaser takes possession of the vehicle at such time, a statement in bold-faced type that, if financing cannot be arranged in accordance with the contract and the sale is not consummated, the purchaser shall agree to pay a daily rate for use of the vehicle until financing of the purchase price of the vehicle is arranged for the obligor by or through the authorized powersports vehicle dealer or until the purchase price is paid in full by or through the obligor, which daily rate shall be agreed upon in writing on the contract.

The information required by subsection (1)(m)(I) of this section shall be read and initialed by both parties at the time of the sale of a powersports vehicle.

The use of the contract form required by subsection (1)(m)(I) of this section shall be mandatory for the sale of a powersports vehicle.

After final action is taken on a hearing held before an administrative law judge or a hearing officer designated by the board from within the board's membership, review the findings of law and fact and the fairness of any fine imposed and uphold the fine, impose an administrative fine upon its own initiative that shall not exceed ten thousand dollars for each separate offense by any licensee, or vacate the fine imposed by the judge or hearing officer; except that, for powersports vehicle dealers who sell primarily vehicles that weigh under one thousand five hundred pounds, the fine for each separate offense shall not exceed one thousand dollars; and

Impose a fine of up to one thousand dollars per day per violation for any person found, after notice and hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105, to have violated the provisions of section 44-20-423 (2).

The board shall:

Order an investigation of all written and signed complaints;

Require an application for a powersports vehicle dealer's license or used powersports vehicle dealer's license to contain, in addition to such information as the board may require, a statement of the following facts:

The name and residence address of the applicant and any trade name under which the applicant intends to conduct business;

If the applicant is a partnership, the name and residence address of each member, whether a limited or general partner, and the name under which the partnership business is to be conducted;

If the applicant is a corporation, the name of the corporation and the name and address of each of its principal officers and directors;

A complete description, including the municipality, street, and number, if any, of the principal place of business, and any other additional places of business as shall be operated and maintained by the applicant;

If the application is for a powersports vehicle dealer's license, the names of the new powersports vehicles that the applicant has been enfranchised to sell or exchange and the name and address of the powersports manufacturer or distributor who has enfranchised the applicant; and

The name and address of any person who will act as a salesperson under the authority of the license, if issued.

The findings of the board under subsection (1) of this section shall be final.

For the purposes of subsections (1)(e) and (1)(g) of this section, the address for the notice to be given under section 24-4-105 is the last-known address for the person as indicated in the state motor vehicle records; the last-known address for the owner of the real property upon which powersports vehicles are displayed in violation of section 44-20-423 (2), as indicated in the records of the county assessor's office; or any address for service of process in accordance with rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

A person who fails to pay a fine ordered by the board for a violation of section 44-20-423 (2) under subsection (1)(o) of this section shall be subject to enforcement proceedings, by the board through the attorney general, in the county or district court pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Fines collected under this subsection (4) shall be disposed of pursuant to section 44-20-430.

If a hearing is conducted by an administrative law judge, the maximum fine that may be imposed is ten thousand dollars for each separate offense by any person licensed by the board pursuant to this part 4; except that, for a powersports vehicle dealer who sells primarily vehicles that weigh under one thousand five hundred pounds, the fine for each separate offense may not exceed one thousand dollars.

If a licensing hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the sanctions that may be recommended by the hearing officer are limited to the denial or grant of an unrestricted license or a restricted license under such terms as the hearing officer deems appropriate.

If a disciplinary hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the hearing officer may only recommend a probationary period of no more than twelve months, a fine of no more than five hundred dollars, or both such probationary period and fine for each separate violation committed by a person licensed by the board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 98, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-504 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-405. Powers and duties of executive director and director.

The executive director is hereby charged with the administration, enforcement, and issuance or denial of the licensing of powersports vehicle distributors, powersports vehicle manufacturer representatives, and powersports vehicle manufacturers, and has the following powers and duties:

To promulgate, amend, and repeal rules reasonably necessary to undertake the functions the executive director is mandated to carry out pursuant to this part 4 and to administer the laws of this state that the executive director deems necessary to carry out the duties of the office of the executive director pursuant to this part 4;

To employ, subject to the laws of this state and after consultation with the board, an executive secretary for the board, who shall be accountable to the board and shall, pursuant to delegation by the board, discharge the responsibilities of the board under this part 4;

To issue and, for reasonable cause shown or upon satisfactory proof of the unfitness of the applicant under this part 4, to refuse to issue to an applicant any license the executive director is authorized to issue by this part 4;

To prescribe the forms to be used for applications for licenses to be issued by the executive director under this part 4 and to require of applicants, as a condition precedent to the issuance of a license, such information concerning the applicant's fitness to be licensed under this part 4 as the executive director considers necessary;

To summarily issue cease-and-desist orders on such terms and conditions, and for such period of time as the executive director deems fair and just, to any person who is licensed by the executive director pursuant to this part 4 if the orders are followed by notice and a hearing pursuant to section 44-20-421;

To issue cease-and-desist orders to persons acting as powersports vehicle manufacturers without the powersports vehicle manufacturer's license required by this part 4; and

To impose a fine, not to exceed one thousand dollars per day, for each violation of section 44-20-423 (1), after a notice and hearing subject to section 24-4-105.

If a person fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order issued pursuant to this section, the executive director may bring a suit for injunction to prevent any further violation of the order. In any such suit, the final proceedings of the executive director, based upon evidence in record, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts found therein.

The director may:

Employ such clerks, deputies, and assistants as the director considers necessary to discharge the duties imposed upon the director or executive director by this part 4 and to designate the duties of the clerks, deputies, and assistants;

Investigate, upon the director's own initiative, upon the written and signed complaint of any person, or upon request by the board under section 44-20-404 (1)(f)(I), any suspected or alleged violation of this part 4 or of any rule promulgated under this article 20;

Delegate authority to persons for the purpose of investigating alleged or suspected violations of this part 4. The investigators and their supervisors utilized by the director, while actually engaged in performing their duties, have the authority as delegated by the director:

To issue subpoenas, in accordance with the performance of their duties, to licensees who are under the jurisdiction of the executive director or the board;

To issue summonses for violations of section 44-20-423 (2);

To issue misdemeanor summonses for violations of section 44-20-422 (1)(a); and

To procure criminal records during an investigation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 103, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-505 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-406. Records as evidence.

Copies of all records and papers in the office of the board, director, or executive director, duly authenticated under the hand and seal of the board, director, or executive director, shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the original.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 104, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-506 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-407. Attorney general to advise and represent.

The attorney general shall represent the board, director, and executive director and shall give opinions on questions of law relating to the interpretation of this part 4 or arising out of the administration thereof and shall appear for and on behalf of the board, director, and executive director in all actions brought by or against them, whether under this part 4 or otherwise.

The board may request the attorney general to make civil investigations and enforce rules of the board in cases of civil violations and to bring and defend civil suits and proceedings for any of the purposes necessary and proper for carrying out the functions of the board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 104, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-507 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-408. Classes of licenses.

The following classes of licenses are issued under this part 4:

A powersports vehicle dealer's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of selling, exchanging, leasing, or offering new and used powersports vehicles, which license shall not permit more than two persons named therein as owners of the business of the licensee to act as powersports vehicle salespersons.

A used powersports vehicle dealer's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of selling, exchanging, leasing, or offering used powersports vehicles only. The license shall also permit a licensee to negotiate for a consumer the sale, exchange, or lease of used and new powersports vehicles not owned by the licensee. Prior to completion of a sale, exchange, or lease of a powersports vehicle not owned by the licensee, the licensee shall disclose in writing to the consumer whether the licensee will receive compensation from the consumer or the owner of the powersports vehicle as a result of the transaction. If the licensee receives compensation from the owner of the powersports vehicle as a result of the transaction, the licensee shall include in the written disclosure the name of the owner from whom the licensee will receive compensation. This license shall not permit more than two persons named therein who shall be owners of the business of the licensee to act as powersports vehicle salespersons.

A powersports vehicle salesperson's license permits the licensee to engage in the activities of a powersports vehicle salesperson while employed by a licensed powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer.

A powersports vehicle manufacturer's or distributor's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the activities of a powersports manufacturer or distributor.

A powersports vehicle manufacturer representative's license shall permit the licensee to engage in the activities of a powersports vehicle manufacturer representative.

A wholesaler's license permits the licensee to engage in the activities of a wholesaler, but does not permit more than two individuals, who must be named in the license and who must be owners or part owners of the business of the licensee, to perform the activities of a wholesaler.

A person who is licensed as a motor vehicle salesperson pursuant to part 1 of this article 20 shall be deemed to be licensed as a powersports vehicle salesperson under this part 4.

A person who is licensed as a motor vehicle manufacturer or distributor pursuant to part 1 of this article 20 shall be deemed to be licensed as a powersports vehicle manufacturer or distributor under this part 4.

A person who is licensed as a motor vehicle manufacturer pursuant to part 1 of this article 20 shall be deemed to be licensed as a powersports vehicle manufacturer under this part 4.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 105, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(f) amended, (HB 19-1286), ch. 425, p. 3715, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-508 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-409. Temporary powersports vehicle dealer license.

If a licensed powersports vehicle dealer has entered into a written agreement to sell a dealership to a purchaser and the purchaser has been awarded a new franchise, the board may issue a temporary powersports vehicle dealer's license to the purchaser or prospective purchaser. The director shall issue the temporary license only after the board has received the applications for both a temporary powersports vehicle dealer's license and a powersports vehicle dealer's license, the appropriate application fee for the powersports vehicle dealer's application, evidence of a passing score of the written examination described in section 44-20-415, and evidence that the franchise has been awarded to the applicant by the powersports vehicle manufacturer.

A temporary powersports vehicle dealer's license authorizes the licensee to act as a powersports vehicle dealer and subjects the licensee to this article 20 and to all rules adopted by the executive director or the board. A temporary powersports vehicle dealer's license is effective for up to sixty days or until the board acts on the licensee's application for a powersports vehicle dealer's license, whichever is sooner.

For the purpose of enabling an out-of-state dealer to sell powersports vehicles on a temporary basis during specifically identified events, the director may issue, upon direction by the board, a temporary powersports vehicle dealer's license that is effective for thirty days. The temporary licensee is subject to the rules adopted by the executive director or the board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 106, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-509 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-410. Display, form, custody, and use of licenses.

The board and the executive director shall prescribe the form of the license to be issued by the executive director, and shall imprint on each license the seal of their offices. The executive director shall mail the license to the business address where the powersports vehicle salesperson is licensed. Each powersports vehicle salesperson shall keep a copy of the license at the salesperson's place of employment for inspection by employers, consumers, the director, the executive director, or the board. A powersports vehicle dealer or wholesaler shall display conspicuously the person's license in the person's place of business.

Each license issued under this part 4 is separate and distinct. It is a violation of this part 4 for a person to exercise any of the privileges granted under a license that the person does not hold, or for a licensee to knowingly allow such an exercise of privileges.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 106, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-510 as it existed prior to 2018.